North Carolina, session 2025, HB1048.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of seventy-two thousand dollars ($72,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Joyful Soul Treasures, Inc., a
nonprofit organization, for the annual Winston-Salem HIV/AIDS Awareness Walk, designed to
raise awareness, reduce stigma, and increase education regarding HIV/AIDS.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1048-v-1*